Illinois, session 104th, SB3624.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by changing 5Section 4-2001 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/4-2001)  (from Ch. 34, par. 4-2001)7    Sec. 4-2001. State's attorney salaries. 8    (a) There shall be allowed to the several state's 9attorneys in this State, except the state's attorney of Cook 10County, the following annual salary: 11        (1) Subject to paragraph (5), to each state's attorney 12    in counties containing less than 10,000 inhabitants, 13    $40,500 until December 31, 1988, $45,500 until June 30, 14    1994, and $55,500 thereafter or as set by the Compensation 15    Review Board, whichever is greater. 16        (2) Subject to paragraph (5), to each state's attorney 17    in counties containing 10,000 or more inhabitants but less 18    than 20,000 inhabitants, $46,500 until December 31, 1988, 19    $61,500 until June 30, 1994, and $71,500 thereafter or as 20    set by the Compensation Review Board, whichever is 21    greater. 22        (3) Subject to paragraph (5), to each state's attorney 23    in counties containing 20,000 or more but less than 30,000   SB3624- 2 -LRB104 18923 RTM 32368 b1    inhabitants, $51,000 until December 31, 1988, $65,000 2    until June 30, 1994, and $75,000 thereafter or as set by 3    the Compensation Review Board, whichever is greater. 4        (4) To each state's attorney in counties of 30,000 or 5    more inhabitants, $65,500 until December 31, 1988, $80,000 6    until June 30, 1994, and $96,837 thereafter or as set by 7    the Compensation Review Board, whichever is greater. 8        (5) Effective December 1, 2000, to each state's 9    attorney in counties containing fewer than 30,000 10    inhabitants, the same salary plus any cost of living 11    adjustments as authorized by the Compensation Review Board 12    to take effect after January 1, 1999, for state's 13    attorneys in counties containing 20,000 or more but fewer 14    than 30,000 inhabitants, or as set by the Compensation 15    Review Board whichever is greater.16    The State shall furnish 66 2/3% of the total annual 17compensation to be paid to each state's attorney in Illinois 18based on the salary in effect on December 31, 1988, and 100% of 19the increases in salary taking effect after December 31, 1988.20    Subject to appropriation, said amounts furnished by the 21State shall be payable monthly by the Department of Revenue 22out of the Personal Property Tax Replacement Fund or the 23General Revenue Fund to the county in which each state's 24attorney is elected.25    Each county shall be required to furnish 33 1/3% of the 26total annual compensation to be paid to each state's attorney   SB3624- 3 -LRB104 18923 RTM 32368 b1in Illinois based on the salary in effect on December 31, 1988.2     Within 90 days after the effective date of this 3amendatory Act of the 96th General Assembly, the county board 4of any county with a population between 15,000 and 50,000 by 5resolution or ordinance may increase the amount of 6compensation to be paid to each eligible state's attorney in 7their county in the form of a longevity stipend which shall be 8added to and become part of the salary of the state's attorney 9for that year. To be eligible, the state's attorney must have 10served in the elected position for at least 20 continuous 11years and elect to participate in a program for an alternative 12annuity for county officers and make the required additional 13optional contributions as authorized by P.A. 90-32. 14    (b) Effective December 1, 2000, no state's attorney may 15engage in the private practice of law. However, until November 1630, 2000, (i) the state's attorneys in counties containing 17fewer than 10,000 inhabitants may engage in the practice of 18law, and (ii) in any county between 10,000 and 30,000 19inhabitants or in any county containing 30,000 or more 20inhabitants which reached that population between 1970 and 21December 31, 1981, the state's attorney may declare his or her 22intention to engage in the private practice of law, and may do 23so through no later than November 30, 2000, by filing a written 24declaration of intent to engage in the private practice of law 25with the county clerk. The declaration of intention shall be 26irrevocable during the remainder of the term of office. The   SB3624- 4 -LRB104 18923 RTM 32368 b1declaration shall be filed with the county clerk within 30 2days of certification of election or appointment, or within 60 3days of March 15, 1989, whichever is later. In that event the 4annual salary of such state's attorney shall be as follows: 5        (1) In counties containing 10,000 or more inhabitants 6    but less than 20,000 inhabitants, $46,500 until December 7    31, 1988, $51,500 until June 30, 1994, and $61,500 8    thereafter or as set by the Compensation Review Board, 9    whichever is greater. The State shall furnish 100% of the 10    increases taking effect after December 31, 1988. 11        (2) In counties containing 20,000 or more inhabitants 12    but less than 30,000 inhabitants, and in counties 13    containing 30,000 or more inhabitants which reached said 14    population between 1970 and December 31, 1981, $51,500 15    until December 31, 1988, $56,000 until June 30, 1994, and 16    $65,000 thereafter or as set by the Compensation Review 17    Board, whichever is greater. The State shall furnish 100% 18    of the increases taking effect after December 31, 1988.19    (c) In counties where a state mental health institution, 20as hereinafter defined, is located, one assistant state's 21attorney shall, subject to appropriation, receive for his 22services, payable monthly by the Department of Revenue out of 23the Personal Property Tax Replacement Fund or the General 24Revenue Fund to the county in which he is appointed, the 25following: 26        (1) To each assistant state's attorney in counties   SB3624- 5 -LRB104 18923 RTM 32368 b1    containing less than 10,000 inhabitants, the sum of $2,500 2    per annum; 3        (2) To each assistant state's attorney in counties 4    containing not less than 10,000 inhabitants and not more 5    than 20,000 inhabitants, the sum of $3,500 per annum; 6        (3) To each assistant state's attorney in counties 7    containing not less than 20,000 inhabitants and not more 8    than 30,000 inhabitants, the sum of $4,000 per annum; 9        (4) To each assistant state's attorney in counties 10    containing not less than 30,000 inhabitants and not more 11    than 40,000 inhabitants, the sum of $4,500 per annum; 12        (5) To each assistant state's attorney in counties 13    containing not less than 40,000 inhabitants and not more 14    than 70,000 inhabitants, the sum of $5,000 per annum; 15        (6) To each assistant state's attorney in counties 16    containing not less than 70,000 inhabitants and not more 17    than 1,000,000 inhabitants, the sum of $6,000 per annum.18    (d) The population of all counties for the purpose of 19fixing salaries as herein provided shall be based upon the 20last Federal census immediately previous to the appointment of 21an assistant state's attorney in each county.22    (e) At the request of the county governing authority, in 23counties where one or more state correctional institutions, as 24hereinafter defined, are located, one or more assistant 25state's attorneys shall, subject to appropriation, receive for 26their services, provided that such services are performed in   SB3624- 6 -LRB104 18923 RTM 32368 b1connection with the state correctional institution, payable 2monthly by the Department of Revenue out of the Personal 3Property Tax Replacement Fund or the General Revenue Fund to 4the county in which they are appointed, the following: 5        (1) $22,000 for each assistant state's attorney in 6    counties with one or more State correctional institutions 7    with a total average daily inmate population in excess of 8    2,000, on the basis of 2 assistant state's attorneys when 9    the total average daily inmate population exceeds 2,000 10    but is less than 4,000; and 3 assistant state's attorneys 11    when such population exceeds 4,000; with reimbursement to 12    be based on actual services rendered. 13        (2) $15,000 per year for one assistant state's 14    attorney in counties having one or more correctional 15    institutions with a total average daily inmate population 16    of between 750 and 2,000 inmates, with reimbursement to be 17    based on actual services rendered. 18        (3) A maximum of $12,000 per year for one assistant 19    state's attorney in counties having less than 750 inmates, 20    with reimbursement to be based on actual services 21    rendered. 22        Upon application of the county governing authority and 23    certification of the State's Attorney, the Director of 24    Corrections may, in his discretion and subject to 25    appropriation, increase the amount of salary reimbursement 26    to a county in the event special circumstances require the   SB3624- 7 -LRB104 18923 RTM 32368 b1    county to incur extraordinary salary expenditures as a 2    result of services performed in connection with State 3    correctional institutions in that county.4    In determining whether or not to increase the amount of 5salary reimbursement, the Director shall consider, among other 6matters: 7        (1) the nature of the services rendered; 8        (2) the results or dispositions obtained; 9        (3) whether or not the county was required to employ 10    additional attorney personnel as a direct result of the 11    services actually rendered in connection with a particular 12    service to a State correctional institution.13    (f) In counties where a State senior institution of higher 14education is located, the assistant state's attorneys 15specified by this Section shall, subject to appropriation, 16receive for their services, payable monthly by the Department 17of Revenue out of the Personal Property Tax Replacement Fund 18or the General Revenue Fund to the county in which appointed, 19the following: 20        (1) $14,000 per year each for employment on a full 21    time basis for 2 assistant state's attorneys in counties 22    having a State university or State universities with 23    combined full time enrollment of more than 15,000 24    students. 25        (2) $7,200 per year for one assistant state's attorney 26    with no limitation on other practice in counties having a   SB3624- 8 -LRB104 18923 RTM 32368 b1    State university or State universities with combined full 2    time enrollment of 10,000 to 15,000 students. 3        (3) $4,000 per year for one assistant state's attorney 4    with no limitation on other practice in counties having a 5    State university or State universities with combined full 6    time enrollment of less than 10,000 students.7    Such salaries shall be paid to the state's attorney and 8the assistant state's attorney in equal monthly installments 9by such county out of the county treasury provided that, 10subject to appropriation, the Department of Revenue shall 11reimburse each county monthly, out of the Personal Property 12Tax Replacement Fund or the General Revenue Fund, the amount 13of such salary. This Section shall not prevent the payment of 14such additional compensation to the state's attorney or 15assistant state's attorney of any county, out of the treasury 16of that county as may be provided by law.17    (g) For purposes of this Section, "State mental health 18institution" means any institution under the jurisdiction of 19the Department of Human Services that is listed in Section 4 of 20the Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities 21Administrative Act.22    For purposes of this Section, "State correctional 23institution" means any facility of the Department of 24Corrections including adult facilities, juvenile facilities, 25pre-release centers, community correction centers, and work 26camps.  SB3624- 9 -LRB104 18923 RTM 32368 b1    For purposes of this Section, "State university" means the 2University of Illinois, Southern Illinois University, Chicago 3State University, Eastern Illinois University, Governors State 4University, Illinois State University, Northeastern Illinois 5University, Northern Illinois University, Western Illinois 6University, and any public community college which has 7established a program of interinstitutional cooperation with 8one of the foregoing institutions whereby a student, after 9earning an associate degree from the community college, 10pursues a course of study at the community college campus 11leading to a baccalaureate degree from the foregoing 12institution (also known as a "2 Plus 2" degree program).13    (h) A number of assistant state's attorneys shall be 14appointed in each county that chooses to participate, as 15provided in this subsection, for the prosecution of 16alcohol-related traffic offenses. Each county shall receive 17monthly a subsidy for payment of the salaries and benefits of 18these assistant state's attorneys from State funds 19appropriated to the Department of Revenue out of the Personal 20Property Tax Replacement Fund or the General Revenue Fund for 21that purpose. The amounts of subsidies provided by this 22subsection shall be adjusted for inflation each July 1 using 23the Consumer Price Index of the Bureau of Labor Statistics of 24the U.S. Department of Labor.25    When a county chooses to participate in the subsidy 26program described in this subsection (h), the number of   SB3624- 10 -LRB104 18923 RTM 32368 b1assistant state's attorneys who are prosecuting 2alcohol-related traffic offenses must increase according to 3the subsidy provided in this subsection. These appointed 4assistant state's attorneys shall be in addition to any other 5assistant state's attorneys assigned to those cases on the 6effective date of this amendatory Act of the 91st General 7Assembly, and may not replace those assistant state's 8attorneys. In counties where the state's attorney is the sole 9prosecutor, this subsidy shall be used to provide an assistant 10state's attorney to prosecute alcohol-related traffic offenses 11along with the state's attorney. In counties where the state's 12attorney is the sole prosecutor, and in counties where a judge 13presides over cases involving a variety of misdemeanors, 14including alcohol-related traffic matters, assistant state's 15attorneys appointed and subsidized by this subsection (h) may 16also prosecute the different misdemeanor cases at the 17direction of the state's attorney.18    Assistant state's attorneys shall be appointed under this 19subsection in the following number and counties shall receive 20the following annual subsidies: 21        (1) In counties with fewer than 30,000 inhabitants, 22    one at $35,000. 23        (2) In counties with 30,000 or more but fewer than 24    100,000 inhabitants, one at $45,000. 25        (3) In counties with 100,000 or more but fewer than 26    300,000 inhabitants, 2 at $45,000 each.   SB3624- 11 -LRB104 18923 RTM 32368 b1        (4) In counties, other than Cook County, with 300,000 2    or more inhabitants, 4 at $50,000 each.3    The amounts appropriated under this Section must be 4segregated by population classification and disbursed monthly.5    If in any year the amount appropriated for the purposes of 6this subsection (h) is insufficient to pay all of the 7subsidies specified in this subsection, the amount 8appropriated shall first be prorated by the population 9classifications of this subsection (h) and then among the 10counties choosing to participate within each of those 11classifications. If any of the appropriated moneys for each 12population classification remain at the end of a fiscal year, 13the remainder of the moneys may be allocated to participating 14counties that were not fully funded during the course of the 15year. Nothing in this subsection prohibits 2 or more State's 16attorneys from combining their subsidies to appoint a joint 17assistant State's attorney to prosecute alcohol-related 18traffic offenses in multiple counties. Nothing in this 19subsection prohibits a State's attorney from appointing an 20assistant State's attorney by contract or otherwise.21    (i) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, 22beginning July 1, 2026, each State's Attorney whose term 23begins after July 1, 2026 shall be compensated at the rate of 24100% of the mean of the amount paid to the resident circuit 25judges in the county courthouse for the State's Attorney. The 26amount shall be calculated on July 1 of each calendar year,   SB3624- 12 -LRB104 18923 RTM 32368 b1thereafter. The State shall furnish 66 2/3% of the total 2annual compensation to be paid to each State's Attorney in the 3State based on the salary in effect on December 31, 1988, and 4100% of the increases in salary taking effect after December 531, 1988. The amount shall be paid from the Personal Property 6Tax Replacement Fund. The moneys shall be deposited by the 7county treasurer into a fund dedicated for that purpose. The 8county shall be responsible for the State and federal income 9tax reporting and withholding and the employer contributions 10under the Illinois Pension Code on the moneys received under 11this subsection.12(Source: P.A. 96-259, eff. 8-11-09; 97-72, eff. 7-1-11.)